Utah statutes.
78A-7-106.   Jurisdiction.
(1)  Justice courts have jurisdiction over class B and C misdemeanors,
violation of ordinances, and infractions committed within their territorial
jurisdiction by a person 18 years of age or older.
(2)  Except those offenses over which the juvenile court has exclusive
jurisdiction, justice courts have jurisdiction over the following class B and
C misdemeanors, violation of ordinances, and infractions committed within
their territorial jurisdiction by a person 16 years of age or older:
(a)  Title 23, Wildlife Resources Code of Utah;
(b)  Title 41, Chapter 1a, Motor Vehicle Act;
(c)  Title 41, Chapter 6a, Traffic Code;
(d)  Title 41, Chapter 12a, Motor Vehicle Financial Responsibility Act;
(e)  Title 41, Chapter 22, Off-Highway Vehicles;
(f)  Title 73, Chapter 18, Safe Boating Act;
(g)  Title 73, Chapter 18a, Boating - Litter and Pollution Control;
(h)  Title 73, Chapter 18b, Water Safety; and
(i)  Title 73, Chapter 18c, Financial Responsibility of Motorboat Owners and
Operators Act.
(3)  Justice Courts have jurisdiction over class C misdemeanor violations of
Title 53, Chapter 3, Part 2, Driver Licensing Act.
(4)  As used in this section, "the court's jurisdiction" means the territorial
jurisdiction of a justice court.
(5)  An offense is committed within the territorial jurisdiction of a justice
court if:
(a)  conduct constituting an element of the offense or a result constituting
an element of the offense occurs within the court's jurisdiction, regardless
of whether the conduct or result is itself unlawful;
(b)  either a person committing an offense or a victim of an offense is
located within the court's jurisdiction at the time the offense is committed;
(c)  either a cause of injury occurs within the court's jurisdiction or the
injury occurs within the court's jurisdiction;
(d)  a person commits any act constituting an element of an inchoate offense
within the court's jurisdiction, including an agreement in a conspiracy;
(e)  a person solicits, aids, or abets, or attempts to solicit, aid, or abet
another person in the planning or commission of an offense within the court's
jurisdiction;
(f)  the investigation of the offense does not readily indicate in which
court's jurisdiction the offense occurred, and:
(i)  the offense is committed upon or in any railroad car, vehicle,
watercraft, or aircraft passing within the court's jurisdiction;
(ii) (A)  the offense is committed on or in any body of water bordering on or
within this state if the territorial limits of the justice court are adjacent
to the body of water; and
(B)  as used in Subsection (3)(f)(ii)(A), "body of water" includes any stream,
river, lake, or reservoir, whether natural or man-made;
(iii)  a person who commits theft exercises control over the affected property
within the court's jurisdiction; or
(iv)  the offense is committed on or near the boundary of the court's
jurisdiction;
(g)  the offense consists of an unlawful communication that was initiated or
received within the court's jurisdiction; or
(h)  jurisdiction is otherwise specifically provided by law.
(6)  Justice courts have jurisdiction of small claims cases under Title 78A,
Chapter 8, Small Claims Courts, if a defendant resides in or the debt arose
within the territorial jurisdiction of the justice court.
(7)  A justice court judge may transfer a matter in which the defendant is a
child to the juvenile court for further proceedings after judgment in the
justice court.
